Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5609.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 31 of the General Laws entitled "MOTOR AND OTHER VEHICLES"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 47.5
ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT STUDY OF MOTOR VEHICLE NON-EXHAUST PARTICLE
EMISSIONS
31-47.5-1. Impact study of motor vehicle non-exhaust emissions.
(a) The department of transportation, in consultation with the department of environmental
management, shall conduct an environmental impact study of non-exhaust emissions particles,
including microplastics, brake wear, tire and road wear, clutch wear and road dust resuspension.
(b) The departments shall be authorized to collaborate with an institute of academic
research, as part of their study. The study shall result in a written report to the general assembly on
the environmental impact of these emissions and contain recommendations to the general assembly
for the reduction of the environmental impact of tire particle emissions.
(c) Both the department of transportation and department of environmental management
shall post their report publicly on their websites, no later than January 1, 2026.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001090
========
LC001090 - Page 2 of 3